Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2462.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 7104. Prohibiting agreements exempting recreational facilities from liability.(a) Prohibited agreements.--A provision in a contract or agreement relating to the use of a recreational facility that purports to limit the recreational facility's liability, or release the recreational facility from or indemnify or hold harmless the recreational facility against liability, for injury caused by or resulting from the failure of the recreational facility to have safety equipment or trained personnel accessible on the premises of the recreational facility is 12345678910111213141516171819 against public policy and is void and unenforceable.(b) Applicability.--This section shall apply to a contract or agreement entered into on or after the effective date of this subsection.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Certified lifeguard." An individual who has a current certificate in lifeguarding issued by a lifeguard certifying authority recognized by the Department of Health."Recreational facility." A commercial recreational facility, a commercial athletic facility or an amusement attraction. The term includes gymnasiums and swimming pools."Safety equipment." Equipment intended to promote the safety of all individuals present on the premises of a recreational facility and that may be used as part of a response to an emergency. The term includes:(1) A surveillance camera.(2) A first aid kit.(3) An automated external defibrillator."Trained personnel." An employee who is trained to respond to a specific emergency occurring on the premises of a recreational facility, which shall include any of the following:(1) An employee trained in the use of an automated external defibrillator.(2) An employee trained and certified to administer cardiopulmonary resuscitation.(3) An employee who is a certified lifeguard.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2462PN3297 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829